Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Veterans' Organizations

48-102-401. Ownership of realty.

The officers and members of a post of the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars, Disabled American Veterans, American Veterans of World War II, Veterans of World War I of the U.S.A., Inc., or any other veterans' organization operating in this state and chartered by the congress of the United States may purchase, own, hold, or take by deed, or otherwise, such quantity of ground or real estate for the purpose of building a hall, or for a burial place, or otherwise, as may be deemed necessary by such officers and members, or may purchase, own, hold, or take by deed or otherwise a lot and building or lots and buildings, for the purpose of converting into and using the same as a suitable hall, or otherwise. The deed or other instrument shall vest title to the real estate, in the name of the post and for its use and benefit and that of its members.

Acts 1925, ch. 152, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2577a14; Code 1932, § 4428; Acts 1945, ch. 90, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4428; Acts 1967, ch. 298, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1519, 48-4-401.

48-102-402. Debts for purchase or improvement of realty.

Posts of the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars, Disabled American Veterans, American Veterans of World War II, Veterans of World War I of the U.S.A., Inc., or any other veterans' organization operating in this state and chartered by the congress of the United States have the authority and power to issue evidence of indebtedness, bearing legal interest, secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the real estate, for the purpose of purchasing a suitable building or buildings for hall purposes or of erecting a building or hall upon their lots or for the purpose of converting a building or buildings into a suitable hall, or for the purpose of improving or repairing the same, or furnishing the same, or for purchasing and paying for grounds for burial purposes, or otherwise. All the posts which shall issue evidence of indebtedness under this part are empowered to execute a mortgage or deed of trust upon the real estate to secure and make certain the payment of the indebtedness thereby secured.

Such posts are further empowered, through their proper officials, to execute a mortgage or deed of trust upon any property or real estate owned by them, for the purpose of borrowing money to purchase ground for such burial place, or ground for erecting or remodeling, improving, or repairing a building suitable for hall purposes, or for repairing, or improving the same, whenever it may become necessary, or to secure the payment of any indebtedness.

Acts 1925, ch. 152, § 2; Shan. Supp. § 2577a15; Code 1932, § 4429; Acts 1945, ch. 90, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4429; Acts 1967, ch. 298, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1520, 48-4-202.

48-102-403. Execution of mortgages and evidences of indebtedness — Liability of members.

The commander of the post has the authority and power to execute and issue the evidence of indebtedness and to execute any mortgage, deed of trust, transfer, or other such conveyance, whenever the commander has been instructed by a regular meeting or meetings called upon ten (10) days' written notice to all members of the post, for that purpose, so to do. All such evidence of indebtedness, mortgages, deeds of trust, or other conveyances shall be executed by such commander in the name of the post, and shall be attested by the adjutant of such post.

Neither the commander, nor the adjutant, nor any member of the post, shall be individually liable for any of the indebtedness incurred by authority of this part.

Acts 1925, ch. 152, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 2577a16; Code 1932, § 4430; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1521, 48-4-403.

48-102-404. Sale of property.

All posts of the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars, Disabled American Veterans, American Veterans of World War II, Veterans of World War I of the U.S.A., Inc., or any other veterans' organization operating in this state and chartered by the congress of the United States have the power, after having acquired any land or property by virtue of this part, to sell, and convey the same, or any part of the same, by proper deed, whenever in their opinion such sale is deemed advisable or necessary; provided, that the sale or sales be authorized at a regular meeting of such post, or at a special meeting of such post, upon ten (10) days' written notice to all members of the post, the notice stating the purpose of the special meeting.

Acts 1927, ch. 52, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 4431; Acts 1945, ch. 90, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4431; Acts 1967, ch. 298, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1522, 48-4-404.

48-102-405. Authority of commander to implement sale.

The commander of the post has the full power to execute in the name of the post and deliver all deeds of conveyance necessary to put into effect the sale or sales whenever the commander has been so instructed and directed by the post, and the deed of conveyance shall be attested by the adjutant of the post.

Acts 1927, ch. 52, § 3; mod. Code 1932, § 4432; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 48-1523, 48-4-405.